3lexc/test1.txt
! this is a comment line

Multichar_Symbols +Verb +Noun +Pl +Sg +3rd +Past +Pres +Fut +Pers +Prog

LEXICON Root
walk V ; 
talk V ;

LEXICON V
+Verb+Sg+3rd:s # ;
+Verb+Past:ed # ; 
+Verb+Prog:ing # ;
+Verb+Pres: # ;
